Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
валандати/T
вдати/T
вдосконалити/T
вивалити/T
видалити/T
вид╕лити/T
видозм╕нити/T
вичерпати/T
вичитати/T
виклопотати/T
викреслити/T
виконати/T
викопати/T
викоренити/T
використати/T
вимотати/T
випалити/T
виправдати/T
випорожнити/T
вир╕вняти/T
висвердлити/T
виселити/T
вискалити/T
висм╕яти/T
вистраждати/T
вистр╕лити/T
витримати/T
визволити/T
визивати/T
вишмагати/T
виховати/T
вибовкати/T
в╕двалити/T
в╕дв╕дати/T
в╕ддалити/T
в╕ддати/T
в╕дд╕лити/T
в╕дчалити/T
в╕дчинити/T
в╕д╕грати/T
в╕дкачати/T
в╕дкреслити/T
в╕дкопати/T
в╕дламати/T
в╕длунати/T
в╕дм╕нити/T
в╕дмотати/T
в╕дпиляти/T
в╕друбати/T
в╕др╕знити/T
в╕дряджати/T
в╕дселити/T
в╕дсилати/T
в╕дсипати/T
в╕дс╕яти/T
в╕дст╕бати/T
в╕дстрахати/T
в╕дстрелити/T
в╕дсторонити/T
в╕дт╕нити/T
в╕дторгати/T
в╕дшукати/T
в╕дшмагати/T
в╕дхилити/T
в╕дб╕лити/T
вкоренити/T
вкор╕нити/T
впаяти/T
впрохати/T
вподобати/T
впорати/T
врубати/T
втеплити/T
вт╕лити/T
втримати/T
возз'╓днати/T
длубати/T
дограти/T
доголити/T
додумати/T
дочитати/T
доконати/T
докопати/T
допитати/T
доповнити/T
досп╕вати/T
достукати/T
дострелити/T
дострибати/T
дозволити/T
дошкандибати/T
дошкулити/T
увалити/T
ув╕чнити/T
ув╕нчати/T
ужалити/T
удосконалити/T
ущ╕льнити/T
учинити/T
укутати/T
укушати/T
укрупнити/T
укопати/T
уплутати/T
упод╕бнити/T
уподобати/T
урезонити/T
усереднити/T
утруднити/T
утримати/T
уточнити/T
узгоджувати/T
узагальнити/T
узаконити/T
курликати/T
метати/T
навалити/T
нав╕шати/T
надумати/T
над╕лити/T
надламати/T
надряпати/T
начинити/T
нац╕лити/T
накачати/T
накрапати/T
накреслити/T
накопати/T
наламати/T
налякати/T
намацати/T
намотати/T
напилити/T
наповнити/T
населити/T
насмикати/T
насп╕вати/T
настукати/T
натягати/T
нашкрябати/T
нахапати/T
нахилити/T
недодумати/T
недооц╕нити/T
недоотримати/T
перевалити/T
перевиконати/T
перевт╕лити/T
переграти/T
передумати/T
передражнити/T
передзвонити/T
перечекати/T
перечитати/T
перекачати/T
перекреслити/T
переконати/T
перекопати/T
переламати/T
перелякати/T
перемацати/T
переманити/T
перемазати/T
переминати/T
перемотати/T
перепалити/T
перепитати/T
переплутати/T
перепродати/T
переповнити/T
перерубати/T
перерозпод╕лити/T
переселити/T
пересилити/T
перестелити/T
пересолити/T
перебруднити/T
переоц╕нити/T
переосмислити/T
переобладнати/T
п╕ддражнити/T
п╕д╕бгати/T
п╕дкачати/T
п╕дкреслити/T
п╕дкопати/T
п╕длатати/T
п╕дм╕нити/T
п╕дпалити/T
п╕друлити/T
п╕друбати/T
п╕дсп╕вати/T
п╕дстелити/T
п╕дсолити/T
п╕дтримати/T
п╕дшукати/T
п╕ймати/T
п╕знати/T
привалити/T
привчати/T
привласнити/T
прид╕лити/T
придбати/T
причалити/T
причинити/T
припинити/T
прист╕бати/T
пристрелити/T
притулити/T
притримати/T
при╓днати/T
пришпилити/T
приховати/T
провалити/T
прогавкати/T
прогнити/T
програти/T
прогризати/T
прогр╕вати/T
продумати/T
продзвонити/T
прочекати/T
прочинити/T
прочитати/T
прокопати/T
промацати/T
проморгати/T
пронюхати/T
пропахати/T
проплавати/T
прорубати/T
просвердлити/T
прослухати/T
просп╕вати/T
простукати/T
прострелити/T
протримати/T
проз╕вати/T
прояснити/T
повалити/T
повергати/T
повертати/T
повикидати/T
пов╕вати/T
пов╕нчати/T
погасати/T
поглинати/T
пограти/T
поголити/T
поженити/T
пожинати/T
пожирати/T
подужати/T
подумати/T
подихати/T
под╕лити/T
подр╕мати/T
подр╕бнити/T
подряпати/T
подзвонити/T
подолати/T
подорожчати/T
подоросл╕шати/T
пощипати/T
почаст╕шати/T
почекати/T
почухати/T
починати/T
почитати/T
покарати/T
покатати/T
покусати/T
покреслити/T
поламати/T
пол╕тати/T
полякати/T
помацати/T
поманити/T
помахати/T
поменшати/T
поневолити/T
поникати/T
понюхати/T
попатрати/T
попереджати/T
поплавати/T
поплутати/T
поповнити/T
поранити/T
поручати/T
порубати/T
поринати/T
порскати/T
порозумн╕шати/T
посватати/T
посв╕ж╕шати/T
поселити/T
посилати/T
посилити/T
послухати/T
посмикати/T
посм╕л╕шати/T
посн╕дати/T
посп╕вати/T
посп╕шати/T
поспостер╕гати/T
постачати/T
постукати/T
поступати/T
постраждати/T
пострибати/T
посягати/T
посолити/T
потурати/T
потирати/T
пот╕снити/T
пот╕шати/T
потримати/T
потр╕пати/T
потоншати/T
поторкати/T
по╓днати/T
позаростати/T
пояснити/T
пошарпати/T
пошукати/T
похвалити/T
похвастати/T
похапати/T
поховати/T
побажати/T
поб╕гати/T
поб╕лити/T
розвалити/T
розвеселити/T
розв╕дати/T
розгойдати/T
роздумати/T
розд╕лити/T
роздр╕бнити/T
роздряпати/T
розчинити/T
розц╕нити/T
роз╕грати/T
розкопати/T
розладнати/T
розламати/T
розм╕шати/T
розмотати/T
рознюхати/T
розпалити/T
розпечатати/T
розпитати/T
розп╕знати/T
розпластати/T
розплутати/T
розпод╕лити/T
розполохати/T
розрубати/T
розр╕знити/T
розселити/T
розс╕длати/T
розстелити/T
розстилати/T
розст╕бати/T
розтерзати/T
розтлити/T
розтринькати/T
роз'╓днати/T
роз'яснити/T
розшукати/T
розхитати/T
розбурхати/T
скачати/T
скопати/T
спалити/T
спутати/T
спитати/T
сп╕ткати/T
спричинити/T
спов╕льнити/T
сполоскати/T
спорожнити/T
стримати/T
схвалити/T
схилити/T
звалити/T
зв╕льнити/T
зволити/T
згарбати/T
завалити/T
завиляти/T
заволати/T
загавкати/T
загуляти/T
загнуздати/T
заграти/T
заграбастати/T
задавнити/T
задумати/T
зад╕яти/T
задр╕мати/T
задзвонити/T
задовольнити/T
зачинити/T
зачитати/T
зачохлити/T
заквакати/T
закапати/T
закабалити/T
закусати/T
закутати/T
заклацати/T
закликати/T
заклинити/T
закреслити/T
закруглити/T
закопати/T
закохати/T
заламати/T
заледенити/T
залякати/T
заляпати/T
заманити/T
замахати/T
замукати/T
замигати/T
зам╕нити/T
замотати/T
занявкати/T
запалати/T
запалити/T
запам'ятати/T
запасати/T
запевнити/T
запечатати/T
запитати/T
заплескати/T
заплутати/T
запл╕днити/T
запхикати/T
заповнити/T
запод╕яти/T
заполонити/T
зарубати/T
заронити/T
засватати/T
заселити/T
засукати/T
засклити/T
заслухати/T
засмикати/T
засм╕яти/T
засп╕вати/T
застелити/T
застукати/T
заст╕бати/T
застрелити/T
застрибати/T
засолити/T
затемнити/T
затулити/T
затуманити/T
зат╕нити/T
зат╕яти/T
затримати/T
заземлити/T
заз╕вати/T
зазнати/T
зашаркати/T
зашикати/T
зашкутильгати/T
зашпилити/T
заштопати/T
захитати/T
захихикати/T
захрюкати/T
заховати/T
забарабанити/T
забулькати/T
заблагати/T
заблукати/T
заблискати/T
забруднити/T
забризкати/T
заборонити/T
заохати/T
зд╕йснити/T
зупинити/T
з╕грати/T
зламати/T
злучати/T
злякати/T
зманити/T
зм╕цнити/T
зм╕нити/T
зм╕шати/T
змотати/T
знец╕нити/T
знесилити/T
зрубати/T
зр╕вняти/T
з'╓днати/T
зяяти/T
збовтати/T
зорати/T
хул╕ганити/T
барахлити/T
бризкати/T
борсати/T
оголити/T
одурманити/T
очолити/T
оц╕нити/T
окислити/T
округлити/T
окрилити/T
опалити/T
опечатати/T
опитати/T
опром╕нити/T
опошлити/T
оселити/T
ос╕длати/T
ос╕кати/T
осмислити/T
осп╕вати/T
отримати/T
ототожнити/T
обвалити/T
обдати/T
обдумати/T
обд╕лити/T
обчислити/T
об╕грати/T
обкутати/T
обладнати/T
обламати/T
обмацати/T
обмотати/T
обн╕мати/T
обнюхати/T
обпалити/T
обприскати/T
обрубати/T
обтискати/T
об'╓днати/T
обшукати/T
оборонити/T
